Tennessee, session 114, SB2167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-5-601(a), is amended by deleting
"advise the department" and substituting "advise the department and the bureau of TennCare".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-5-601(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following to the end of the subdivision:
The director of long-term care services for the bureau of TennCare, or the director's
designee, shall serve as a member of the council. Additionally, the director shall appoint
one (1) person to the council from the bureau of TennCare's contracted managed care
organizations.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-5-602(a), is amended by deleting
"advise the commissioner" and substituting "advise the commissioner and the director of
TennCare" and by deleting "appropriations for the programs" and substituting "appropriations for
the implementation of TennCare waivers and the department's programs".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 52-5-602(c), is amended by deleting
"of the department" and substituting "of the department and the bureau of TennCare" and by
deleting "commissioner shall make" and substituting "commissioner and the director of
TennCare shall make".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2167
012425
- 1 -